Hawaii statutes.
[§321-225.5] Fall prevention and early detection coordinator. There is established within the emergency medical
services and injury prevention system branch a fall prevention and early
detection coordinator to coordinate the provision of public and private fall
prevention and early detection services for the elderly. [L 2014, c 153,
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next